District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.18

Judicial review of Commission orders.

A financing order, an order approving an Underground Infrastructure Improvement Projects Plan, an order amending an Underground Infrastructure Improvement Projects Plan, or an order approving an annual adjustment to the Underground Project Charges are each a final order of the Commission. Any party aggrieved by the issuance of any such Commission order may apply to the Commission for reconsideration of the order in accordance with § 34-604 and, thereafter, appeal to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals in accordance with §§ 34-605 through 34-609. The Court of Appeals shall proceed to hear and determine the appeal as expeditiously as practicable and give the appeal precedence over other matters not accorded similar precedence by law.

History

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 318, 61 DCR 1882